ro-RO: Notă de utilizare a ingredientelor din parfumerie: Toate notele; Notă de bază; Notă de mijloc (inimă); Mijloc spre bază; Notă de vârf; Vârf spre mijloc; Altele
ko: 향수 원료 사용 노트: 모든 노트; 베이스 노트; 미들(하트) 노트; 미들-베이스; 탑 노트; 탑-미들; 기타
da: Note om brug af parfumeingredienser: Alle noter; Bundnote; Mellemnote (hjertenote); Mellem- til bundnote; Topnote; Top- til mellemnote; Andet
nb: Bruksmerknad for parfymeingrediens: Alle noter; Basenote; Mellomnote (hjertenote); Mellom- til basenote; Toppnote; Topp- til mellomnote; Annet
hu: Megjegyzés a parfümkészítési összetevő használatára vonatkozóan: Minden illatjegy; Alapillat; Szívillat; Szív- és alapillat; Fejillat; Fej- és szívillat; Egyéb
pt-PT: Nota sobre a utilização de ingredientes em perfumaria: Todas as notas; Nota de fundo; Nota de corpo (coração); De corpo para fundo; Nota de saída; De saída para corpo; Outro
pl: Nuta użytkowa składnika perfumeryjnego: Wszystkie nuty; Nuta bazy; Nuta serca; Od nuty serca do nuty bazy; Nuta głowy; Od nuty głowy do nuty serca; Inne
el: Σημείωση για τη χρήση συστατικών αρωματοποιίας: Όλες οι νότες; Νότα βάσης; Μεσαία νότα (καρδιάς); Από μεσαία σε βάσης; Νότα κορυφής; Από κορυφής σε μεσαία; Άλλο
de: Anwendungshinweis für Duftstoffe: Alle Noten; Basisnote; Mittel- (Herz-) Note; Mittel- zu Basisnote; Kopfnote; Kopf- zu Mittelnote; Sonstige
zh-CN: 香水原料香调层级: 全调; 尾调; 中调（心调）; 中调至尾调; 前调; 前调至中调; 其他
sv: Anmärkning om användning av parfymingredienser: Alla noter; Basnot; Mellannot (hjärtnot); Mellan till bas; Toppnot; Topp till mellan; Övrigt
en: Perfumery ingredient usage note: All notes; Base note; Middle (heart) note; Middle-to-base; Top note; Top-to-middle; Other
pt-BR: Perfumaria ingrediente nota de uso: Todas as notas; Nota de base/fundo; Nota de corpo (coração); Corpo a base; Nota de saída/cabeça; Saída a corpo; Outro
fi: Hajusteen ainesosan käyttöä koskeva huomautus: Kaikki nuotit; Pohjanuotti; Keskinuotti (sydännuotti); Keskinuotista pohjanuottiin; Latvanuotti; Latvanuotista keskinuottiin; Muu
zh-TW: 香水原料使用香調: 所有香調; 後調; 中調; 中至後調; 前調; 前至中調; 其他
sk-SK: Tón použitia ingrediencií parfumu: Všetky tóny; Základný tón; Stredný tón (srdce); Od stredného po základný; Vrchný tón; Od vrchného po stredný; Iné
hr-HR: Napomena o korištenju sastojaka parfumera: Sve note; Donja nota; Srednja (srčana) nota; Srednja prema donjoj; Gornja nota; Gornja prema srednjoj; Ostalo
es: Nota sobre el uso de ingredientes de perfumería: Todas las notas; Nota de fondo; Nota media (corazón); De media a fondo; Nota de salida; De salida a media; Otro
sl-SI: Uporabniška nota parfumske sestavine: Vse note; Spodnja nota; Srednja (srčna) nota; Od srednje do spodnje note; Zgornja nota; Od zgornje do srednje note; Drugo
bg-BG: Бележка за употреба на парфюмерийни съставки: Всички нотки; Базова нотка; Средна (сърдечна) нотка; Средна към базова; Връхна нотка; Връхна към средна; Друго
fr: Note d’usage de l’ingrédient de parfumerie: Toutes les notes; Note de fond; Note de cœur; Cœur à fond; Note de tête; Tête à cœur; Autre
th: หมายเหตุเกี่ยวกับการใช้ส่วนผสมในน้ำหอม: โน้ตทั้งหมด; เบสโน้ต; มิดเดิล (ฮาร์ต) โน้ต; มิดเดิลทูเบส; ท็อปโน้ต; ท็อปทูมิดเดิล; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Parfumerijos ingrediento naudojimo nata: Visos natos; Bazinė nata; Vidurinė (širdies) nata; Nuo vidurinės iki bazinės; Viršutinė nata; Nuo viršutinės iki vidurinės; Kita
cs: Poznámka k použití parfumérských složek: Všechny tóny; Základní tón; Střední tón (srdce); Střední až základní; Vrchní tón; Vrchní až střední; Ostatní
nl: Parfumerie-ingrediënt gebruiksnoot: Alle noten; Basisnoot; Middennoot (hartnoot); Midden tot basis; Topnoot; Top tot midden; Overig
tr: Parfüm bileşeni kullanım notu: Tüm notalar; Alt nota; Orta (kalp) nota; Ortadan alta; Üst nota; Üstten ortaya; Diğer
it: Nota sull'uso dell'ingrediente di profumeria: Tutte le note; Nota di fondo; Nota di cuore; Tra cuore e fondo; Nota di testa; Tra testa e cuore; Altro
ja: 香水原料使用上の注意: 全てのノート; ベースノート; ミドル（ハート）ノート; ミドル〜ベース; トップノート; トップ〜ミドル; その他
vi: Ghi chú về cách sử dụng các thành phần nước hoa: Tất cả các tầng hương; Hương cuối; Hương giữa (hương chính); Hương giữa đến hương cuối; Hương đầu; Hương đầu đến hương giữa; Khác
ru: Нота использования парфюмерного ингредиента: Все ноты; Базовая нота; Средняя нота (нота сердца); От средних к базовым; Верхняя нота; От верхних к средним; Другое